Mississippi, session 2026, HB1425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Any person who is elected to the Mississippi Legislature may recruit and hire a part-time legislative assistant to serve in the State Capitol or in the member's home district for such time as the member remains in office.  The Legislature shall appropriate funds as may be necessary for the employment of such legislative assistants. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.